Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3505
Articles of association; objections.

Any owner of real estate situated in the proposed community improvement district who has not signed the articles of association and who may object to the organization of the community improvement district or to any one or more of the proposed trustees shall, at least seven calendar days prior to the date of the hearing scheduled pursuant to subsection (1) of section 18-3504, file any such objection in writing with the city or village clerk where the articles were filed, stating (1) why such community improvement district should not be organized and declared a public corporation in this state, (2) why the owner's real estate should not be embraced in the limits of such community improvement district, and (3) any objections to the proposed trustees.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 5.
April 17, 2026